lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_markedStrongGH.txt
!----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}an        VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}an      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gken    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}itn       VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}itn     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itn          VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gken VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^itn            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itn          VerbRootEte;
!----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.4SgPoss.Sg]:^min              VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Pl]:^min            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmin    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meggn            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meggn          VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmeggn  VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megn             VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megn           VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmegn   VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megten           VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megten         VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmegten VerbRootEte;
!----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
